Illinois, session 104th, HB3054.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by 5changing Section 5.8 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 10/5.8)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-594)8    Sec. 5.8. Radon testing of licensed day care centers, 9licensed day care homes, and licensed group day care homes.10    (a) Effective January 1, 2013, licensed day care centers, 11licensed day care homes, and licensed group day care homes 12shall have the facility tested for radon at least once every 3 13years pursuant to rules established by the Illinois Emergency 14Management Agency.15    (b) Effective January 1, 2014, as part of an initial 16application or application for renewal of a license for day 17care centers, day care homes, and group day care homes, the 18Department shall require proof the facility has been tested 19within the last 3 years for radon pursuant to rules 20established by the Illinois Emergency Management Agency. 21    (c) The report of the most current radon measurement shall 22be posted in the facility next to the license issued by the 23Department. Copies of the report shall be provided to parents   HB3054- 2 -LRB104 08897 AAS 18952 b1or guardians upon request. 2    (d) Included with the report referenced in subsection (c) 3shall be the following statement:4        "Every parent or guardian is notified that this 5    facility has performed radon measurements to ensure the 6    health and safety of the occupants. The Illinois Emergency 7    Management Agency (IEMA) recommends that all residential 8    homes be tested and that corrective actions be taken at 9    levels equal to or greater than 4.0 pCi/L. Radon is a Class 10    A human carcinogen, the leading cause of lung cancer in 11    non-smokers, and the second leading cause of lung cancer 12    overall. For additional information about this facility 13    contact the licensee and for additional information 14    regarding radon contact the IEMA Radon Program at 15    800-325-1245 or on the Internet at 16    www.radon.illinois.gov.". 17    (e) On and after July 1, 2026, mitigation shall be 18required when testing confirms radon levels above 4.0 pCi/L. 19Mitigation shall be conducted according to industry standards. 20If radon test results are at or above 4.0 pCi/L and below 8.0 21pCi/L, the licensed day care center, licensed day care home, 22or licensed group day care home shall create a corrective 23action plan that shall include long-term radon tests that show 24levels below 4.0 pCi/L. If radon test results exceed 8.0 25pCi/L, initial applicants shall mitigate before a license is 26issued and license renewal applicants shall close operations   HB3054- 3 -LRB104 08897 AAS 18952 b1until the radon standard of 4.0 pCi/L or lower is achieved. 2(Source: P.A. 97-981, eff. 1-1-13.) 3    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-594)4    Sec. 5.8. Radon testing of licensed day care centers, 5licensed day care homes, and licensed group day care homes.6    (a) Licensed day care centers, licensed day care homes, 7and licensed group day care homes shall have the facility 8tested for radon at least once every 3 years pursuant to rules 9established by the Illinois Emergency Management Agency.10    (b) As part of an initial application or application for 11renewal of a license for day care centers, day care homes, and 12group day care homes, the Department of Early Childhood shall 13require proof the facility has been tested within the last 3 14years for radon pursuant to rules established by the Illinois 15Emergency Management Agency. 16    (c) The report of the most current radon measurement shall 17be posted in the facility next to the license issued by the 18Department of Early Childhood. Copies of the report shall be 19provided to parents or guardians upon request. 20    (d) Included with the report referenced in subsection (c) 21shall be the following statement:22        "Every parent or guardian is notified that this 23    facility has performed radon measurements to ensure the 24    health and safety of the occupants. The Illinois Emergency 25    Management Agency (IEMA) recommends that all residential   HB3054- 4 -LRB104 08897 AAS 18952 b1    homes be tested and that corrective actions be taken at 2    levels equal to or greater than 4.0 pCi/L. Radon is a Class 3    A human carcinogen, the leading cause of lung cancer in 4    non-smokers, and the second leading cause of lung cancer 5    overall. For additional information about this facility 6    contact the licensee and for additional information 7    regarding radon contact the IEMA Radon Program at 8    800-325-1245 or on the Internet at 9    www.radon.illinois.gov.". 10    (e) On and after July 1, 2026, mitigation shall be 11required when testing confirms radon levels above 4.0 pCi/L. 12Mitigation shall be conducted according to industry standards. 13If radon test results are at or above 4.0 pCi/L and below 8.0 14pCi/L, the licensed day care center, licensed day care home, 15or licensed group day care home shall create a corrective 16action plan that shall include long-term radon tests that show 17levels below 4.0 pCi/L. If radon test results exceed 8.0 18pCi/L, initial applicants shall mitigate before a license is 19issued and license renewal applicants shall close operations 20until the radon standard of 4.0 pCi/L or lower is achieved. 21(Source: P.A. 103-594, eff. 7-1-26.) 22    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 23changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 24that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 25represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does   HB3054- 5 -LRB104 08897 AAS 18952 b1not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 2made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 3Public Act.